tools/hyphenators/hyph_sma.dic
øl1b2æ1
ø1l2e1
øl1g2o1
ø2l1g
ø1l2i1
øl1l2e1
ø2l1l
øl1n2e2
ø2l1n
ø2l1s2
ø2l1s2e1
ø2l2u
ø2l1v1
øl1v2e1
øm1
øm2m2i1
ø2m1m2
ømt2e1
ø2m1t
ø1m2ö1
ø2n
1øn.
øn1d2e1
ø2n1d
ø1n2e1
ø1n2i1
ø2n1n2e1
ø2n1n
øn1n2i1
ø2ns2t1
ø2n1s2
ø2n1t
1ø1o2
ø1p2
ø1p2i1
ø1p2o1
ø1p2u1
2ø2r
ø1r2a1
ø1r2e1
ør1h2a1
ø2rh
ø2rk1
ør1m2e1
ø2r1m2
ø1r2os1
ø1r2o
ør1p2e1
ø2r1p2
ør1r2e1
ø2r1r2
ø2r2s1
ø2r1t2
ø1r2u1
ø1r1å
ø1r2å1l1
2øs1
ø1s2a1
ø2ses1
ø1s2e
ø1s2i
øsih1
ø2sj
ø2s2k2
øs1s2a1
ø2s2s2
1ø2s2t
øs2t2a
ø2s2å1
øš2
ø1š2á1
1ø1t1
ø1t2a1
ø2t2r2
1ø1t2u
øu1l1
1ø1v1
ø1v2e2
ø1v2er1
ø1v2i1
øv1r2i1
ø2v1r
1ø2vs2
ø2v2å
1ø2w
1ø2y2
ø2ya
øy1a1n1
øy2e1
øy1n2i1
øy2n
øys2
ø1y1s2a1
ø1yt1
1ø1z
øä2
øø1p2
øå2
öá1j1
ö1ál1
ö2b1
öbi1l1
ö1b2i
ö2b1l2
öb1l2e1
öb1p2i1
ö2b1p2
1öc
ö2c2h2
ö1č
1ö1d2a
ö1d2e
1öd2e2e
1öd2e1m
ö1d2i
ö2d2r2
öd1r2i1
ö2d2s2
öd2s2a1
öd1t2o1
ö2d1t
ö1d2ö
ö1e2
öe1b1
öe1b2i1
1öes1
öf2
ö2f2h1
ö2f1n1
öf1v2e1
ö2f1v
ö2g1
ö1g2a1
ö1g2e1
ög1k2e1
ö2g1k2
1ö1g1r2
öh2
öh1l2a1
ö2h2l2
1ö2h1m
öh1r2e1
ö2h1r2
1ö2i
öi1j1
2öj1
ö1j2e
ö2j1g2
ö1j2i1
öjï2e1
ö1j2ï
öj1j2o1
ö2j1j2
öj1k2e1
ö2j1k
öj1m2e1
ö2j1m2
öj1m2i1
öj1p2i1
ö2j2p2
ö2j2r
öj2s2e1
ö2j1s2
öj1t2i1
ö2j1t2
öj1v2i1
ö2j1v
ö1k
ö1k2e2
ö1k2i1
ök1k2i1
ö2k1k2
1ö1k2o1
ökt2e1
ö2k1t
ök1t2i1
öku1l1
ö1k2u
1öku1m
öl1d2a1
ö2ld2
ö1l2e1
ö2lh1
öl2h1t1
ö1l2i1
öl2l2ä1
ö2l1l
1ö2l1m
ö2l1s2e1
ö2l1s2
ö2l1v1
2ö1m
ö2m2b
ömi1j1
ö1m2i
ö2m1s2
öm1s2e1
ön1d2e1
ö2n1d
ön1d2o2
ön1d2u1
ö1n2e1
ö2n2g
ö1n2i1
öni1j1
ö2n1n
ön1n2i1
1ö1n2o1
ö2n2s2
2ö2n1t
öŋ1
ö1o2
öo1f1
ö2os1
öó1
öp1
öpas2
ö1p2a
ö2p2h1
ö1p2i1
öp1s2e1
ö2ps2
öpt2e1
ö2p1t2
öp1t2i1
ö1r2a1
1ö2r1b2
ö2r1d1
ö1r2e1
1öre1b2
ö2rh1
ö1r2i1
ör2i1j1
ö2r1k1
ör1k2e1
ö2rn1
1ör2n1s2
ö1r2o1
ör1p2i1
ö2r1p2
ör1r2e1
ö2r1r2
ö2r1s1
ör1s2e1
ö2r2ö2
ö1s2a
ö1s2e1
1ös2e1l
ö2sj1
ö2s2k2
ö2s1l2
ös2l2e1
ös2m2i1
ö2s2m2
1ö2s2n2
1ö2s2t
ös1t2e
ös1t2i1
ö1š2á1
2öt
ö1t2e1
ö1t2e1t1
ö2th1
ö1t2j
ö1t2s
öt1t2i1
ö2t1t
öus1
ö2v1d
öv1d2e1
ö1v2e
öv2e1l1
ö1v2er1
ö2v2g
ö2v2h1
öv2h1t1
ö1v2i
ö2v2ï2
öv1j2e1
ö2v2j2
öv1l2e1
ö2v1l2
öv1m2i1
ö2v2m2
1ö2v1t
öw2
1ö1y1
ö1y2a
öy2am1
öys2
1ö1z
ö2ö
öö2b1
1ööd
1öö2d1t
2öö2g1
1öö2h1p
ööh2
1ö2öj1
1öö1k
1öö2k1t
1ööl
1öö2l1k2
ö2ö1m1
1öö1r2e1
1öö2r1n1
1öö2r1v
1öö2s2m2
ö1ö2s2t
2ööv1
ö1å
öål1
å2a
åab1
1å2ad1
1åa2e
1åah.
å2ah1
1åa2h1p
1åaj1
å2ak1
1å1a2l1m
åa1m2a1
åa1m2e1
åa1n
åa1n2a1
1å2a1p1
1åa2r1d
1åa1r2e2
1åa2r1v
åa2s2
åa1s2a1
1åa2s2g2
åa2t
åa1v1
1åa2v1r
å1á
2å2b1
åb1j2e1
å2bj2
åb1l2e1
å2b1l2
åbor1
å1b2o
åb1p2a1
å2b1p2
åb1r2
å2b1r2a1
åbt2e1
å2b2t2
åc2
åd1
ådal1
å1d2a
å1d2e1
1å2d1n2
å1d1n2e1
1åd1t2o1
å2d1t
1å2e
åe1b1
å2e2e
å2ej1
åe1l2e1
å2e1l
åe1m2e1
å2e1m
1å2e2r1
åe1r2e1
åe2rh1
å2ev1
2åf1
åf2f2a1
å2f1f
å1f2j2
2åg
å2g2a
å2g1d2
å2g1es1
å1g2e
å2g1h
å1g2i1
å2g1i1n
å2g2j2
å1g2o1
1å2g1r2
1å2g1s2
å2g2ä2
å2g2å
2åh1
åh1l2e1
å2h2l2
1åh1r2e1
å2h1r2
åh1t2a1
å2ht
åh1t2o1
1åht2s1
2å2i
åih1
å1i1n
2åj1
å2j2d2
å1j2e
åje1s1
åj2h1t
å2j2h1
å1j2i1
åj1j2o1
å2j1j2
1å2k1
å1k2e
åk2er1
åk1r2a1
å2k2r2
åk1r2e1
åk1s2e1
å2k1s
åk2v2i1
å2k2v2
å1l2a1
1å2lb2
å2l1d2
å1l2e1
ål2e1r1
å2lh2
ål2h1t1
1ål1h2u1
å1l2i1
1å1l2j2
å1lj2a1
1å2l1k2
1ål1k2o1
ål1l2a1
å2l1l
ål1l2e1
1ål1l2i1
1ål1l2o1
1ål1m2a1
å2l1m
1ål1m2e
ål2m2h1
1ål2m2i1
å1l2o1
å2l1p
å2l2s2
2åm
1å2m1d2
åm2er1
å1m2e
åme1s1
å2m2h1
1åm2h1k
åm2h1t1
1å2m1n2
åm1n2e1
1å2m2o1
åm1p2a1
å2m1p
åm1p2e1
1å2ms2
å2m2å
2ån
1ån.
1åne.
å1n2e
1ån2g
å1n1g2a1
å1n1g2e1
å2n1h2
å1n2j2
ån1k2a1
å2n1k
ån1n2a1
å2n1n
1ån2n1ø2
å1n2o1
åó1
å2p1
åp2s2e
å2ps2
åpt2e1
å2p1t2
å1q
2år
å1r2a1
år1b2o1
å2r1b2
å2r2d
år1d2e1
å1r2e1
1å2r1g
år1g2a1
å2rh1
å1r2i1
år1j2o1
å2rj
år2j2ä1
å2rk2
1år1k2i1
å2r2n1
år1p2a1
å2r1p2
år1r2a1
å2r1r2
å2r1s1
år1s2e1
årt2e1
å2r1t
å1r2u1
år2uf1
år1ø2
å2s2
1ås.
å1s2a1
åsa1n1
1å1s2e
åse1n1
ås1h2a1
å2s1h2
1å1s2i
ås2i1j1
å1sj1
ås1l2
å1s2m2a1
å2s2m2
ås1s2a1
å2s2s2
1ås2sj
ås2t1
ås1t2a1
ås1t2o1
ås1v2a1
å2s2v2
1ås1v2o
1ås2v2æ
å1s2å1
å1š
2åt2
1åt.
å1t2a
å1t2e
å1te1n1
å2t2f1
å1t2i1
1åt2j1
1å2tm
1åt2s1
åt1t2e1
å2t1t
å2t2å
åv1
å1v2a
å1v2e
å2v2h1
1åv2h1t
å1v2i1
åv1k2a1
å2v1k
1åv2l2a1
å2v1l2
1åv1l2i1
åv1m2e1
å2v2m2
åv1r2i
å2v1r
1å2v1t
åv1v2e1
å2v1v2
åvær1
å1v2æ
åv2år1
å1v2å
1å1w
2å2å
å2å1g
åå1m2e1
å2åm
å1å2m1s2
å2ån1
åå2r2d1
å2år
åå2r2n1
åå1t2e1
å2åt2
åå1v2e1
ååv1
'an1
'a2r1c1
'2b
'd2
'2e
'2h
'1h2a1
'ham1
'2i
'j2
'2m
'or1
'2s2
'1ö
1'2å
`j2
`2s2
´j2
´2l
´las2
´1l2a
´2s2
1°c
1°f
